Arkansas statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 3

Publication of Laws, Reports, Etc.

Effective Dates.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 14: effective on passage. Declared effective by Governor, Oct. 13, 1914.

Acts 1915, No. 83, § 3: approved Feb. 25, 1915. Emergency clause provided: “This Act being necessary for the immediate protection of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

1-3-101. Penalty.

Every person who shall fail to comply with the provisions of §§1-3-103 and1-3-105 —1-3-108 shall be fined in any sum not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 13, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8801; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-212.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1917, No. 471, p. 2172, provided:

“That Act No. 3 [2], known as the Publicity Act, initiated and adopted by the people at the general election held in September, 1914, be and the same is hereby repealed; provided, that this Act shall not go into effect until the next general election, when the same shall be submitted to the voters of each county for ratification or rejection; that at the next general election held for the election of State and county officers, there shall be printed on the ballot the words, ‘For Act No. 3’ [2] and ‘Against Act No. 3,’ [2] and in any county in which the majority of the voters voting on such question vote against Act No. 3 [2], then in such county said Act shall be repealed, and this Act shall be in full force and effect.”
The results of the election are not known.

1-3-102. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, requiring the Secretary of State to print a synopsis of general laws, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 256, § 1. The section was derived from Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 2; Acts 1915, No. 104, § 2; Pope's Dig., § 8790; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-201.

1-3-103. Orders of Arkansas Public Service Commission and Arkansas Transportation Commission [abolished].

The respective secretaries of the Arkansas Public Service Commission and the Arkansas Transportation Commission [abolished] shall cause to be published one (1) time, in one (1) newspaper in each county in this state, all general orders of the respective commissions.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 3, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8791; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-202.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Transportation Commission was abolished and replaced by the Transportation Regulatory Board and the Transportation Safety Agency pursuant to Acts 1987, No. 572.
However, Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, § 23 and Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 153, §§ 2, 3, abolished the board and the agency and transferred their powers, functions, and duties to the State Highway Commission and the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department [now the Arkansas Department of Transportation], respectively.

1-3-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning a summary of assessment proceedings, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 27, § 1. The section was derived from Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 4, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8792; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-203.

1-3-105. Report of commissioners of special improvement districts.

All annual reports of the commissioners of special improvement districts shall be published one (1) time in one (1) newspaper published in the municipality in which the district exists.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 8, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8796; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-207.

1-3-106. Newspapers eligible to publish notices.

In all counties in which there are cities of the first class, the publication provided for in this chapter may be made in one (1) daily newspaper of general circulation or in one (1) or more weekly newspapers of general circulation in the county.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 12, Acts 1915, p. 1511; 1933, No. 239, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8800; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-211.

1-3-107. Fees for publishing notices.

(a)

The fees allowed for the publications provided in this chapter shall not exceed one-half (½) of the legal rate provided by law for the publication of legal notices except in the case of a newspaper having a sworn circulation of more than five thousand (5,000) when full legal rates shall be paid.

(b)(1)

All accounts for publication required by §1-3-102 [repealed] shall be paid by the state.

(2)

All accounts under §1-3-103 shall be paid by the state when approved by the Arkansas Public Service Commission or the Arkansas Transportation Commission [abolished], as appropriate.

(3)

All accounts for publications required by §1-3-104 [repealed] shall be paid by the county in which the publications are made, when the publications are approved by the county court, and the respective levying courts are authorized to make appropriation for that purpose.

(4)

All accounts for publications under §1-3-105 shall be paid by the improvement districts making the publications when the publications have been approved by the commissioners of the districts.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 9, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8797; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-208.

Publisher's Notes.

The Arkansas Transportation Commission was abolished and replaced by the Transportation Regulatory Board and the Transportation Safety Agency pursuant to Acts 1987, No. 572.
However, Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 67, § 23 and Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 153, §§ 2, 3, abolished the board and the agency and transferred their powers, functions, and duties to the State Highway Commission and the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department [now the Arkansas Department of Transportation], respectively.

1-3-108. Publications in more than one newspaper.

The officials who are required by this chapter to cause publications to be made may cause them to be made in more than one (1) newspaper when it is possible to secure more general publicity without additional expense.

History.

Init. Meas. 1914, No. 2, § 11, Acts 1915, p. 1511; Pope's Dig., § 8799; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-210.

1-3-109. Printing of publication cost.

(a)

All newspapers publishing anything under the provisions of §§1-3-101,1-3-103, and1-3-105 —1-3-109 shall print free of charge at the head of each of the publications, in type of double the size of the publication itself, the following words: “The cost of this publication to the taxpayers is the sum of
dollars.”

(b)

Any newspaper or proprietor or editor of any newspaper failing to comply with this section shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1915, No. 83, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 15-201n; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b).